Hawaii, session 2025, GM1224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Chapter 286, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§286- License plate flipping devices; prohibited. (a)
No person shall operate a motor vehicle with, possess, purchase,
install, sell, offer for sale, or otherwise distribute a license
plate flipping device. This section shall apply to any motor
vehicle operated on public roadways in the State, regardless of
the jurisdiction of registration. Each act described in this
subsection shall constitute a separate and distinct violation,
regardless of whether multiple acts occur simultaneously or are
committed in connection with other violations.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter,
any person who violates this section shall be fined no less than
$750 but no more than $1,000 for each separate violation. Each
instance of a violation shall constitute a separate offense.
2025-3284 HB228 GDI HMSO
iiMiiiiiiiiiiiniiiiin

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(c) For the purposes of this section, "license plate
flipping device" means a manual, electric, or mechanical device
designed or adapted to be installed on a motor vehicle that:
(1) Swit^hes between tj^o or more J^i£en^e£labes for tl^
purpose of allowing a motor vehicle operator to change
the license plate displayed on the vehicle; or
(2) Hides a license plate from view by flipping the
license plate so that the plate number is not
visible."
§286- ^stxuction_of_a_license_glate2_2£21ii^i£S^ The
use of any cover or shield installed over a vehicle's license
plate, regardless of transparency or intent, shall be
prohibited. Any person who violates this section shall be fined
no less than $500 and no more than $1,000 for each offense.
Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense. For
the purposes of this section, "cover" or "shield" means any
device, material, or film—whether clear, tinted, mirrored,
reflective, or otherwise that is installed over or affixed to a
license plate, and is intended to alter or interfere with the
visibility, legibility, or identification of the license plate
by law enforcement or traffic enforcement systems."
2025-3284 HB228 CDl HMSO 2
■Hiiiiiiiiiiiinm

Page 3 H.B. NO. |.i
C,D. 1
SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3284 HB228 CDl HMSO 3
■luiHiiiniiHiiniiiii

H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 29th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 228, HD 1,SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 228, H.D, 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30,2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate